New York, session 2025-2026, S4433.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 2 38-C to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 38-C 4 ONLINE SALE OF GROCERIES 5 Section 840. Definitions. 6 841. Disclosure of pricing policy. 7 § 840. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms shall 8 have the following meanings: 9 (a) "Food retailer" shall mean a supermarket, grocery store or other 10 retailer that operates on a self-service basis and sell a minimum 11 percentage, as determined by the secretary of state, of produce, meat, 12 poultry, seafood, baked goods and/or dairy products. 13 (b) "In store price" shall mean the price charged to the consumer for 14 a particular product when purchased within the grocery store's physical 15 store location. 16 (c) "Online price" shall mean the price charged to the consumer for a 17 product purchased or ordered through any website, mobile application or 18 other internet service. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01303-05-5 S. 4433--A 2 1 (d) "Third-party delivery platform" shall mean any website, mobile 2 application or other internet service that offers or arranges the sale, 3 purchase, delivery or pickup of any products from a grocery store or 4 food retailer online. 5 § 841. Disclosure of pricing policy. 1. Any food retailer, or third- 6 party delivery platform shall clearly and conspicuously provide a pric- 7 ing policy that discloses whether the online price of products is the 8 same as the in store price, or if it is not the same. The disclosure 9 shall indicate whether the online price is higher or lower than the in 10 store price. For third-party delivery platforms, this disclosure shall 11 use the prices most recently provided to it by the food retailer. If 12 food retailers listed on a third-party delivery platform have different 13 pricing policies, a third-party delivery platform may satisfy the 14 requirements of this section by prominently including a pricing policy 15 disclosure on the primary landing page for that food retailer. If a food 16 retailer has a website, the third-party delivery platform must post a 17 link to the website on their platform in a manner that is easily notice- 18 able to the consumer. 19 2. In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a violation of 20 the provisions of this section shall constitute an offense punishable by 21 a fine of not more than one hundred dollars for the first offense and 22 not more than two hundred fifty dollars for a second or each subsequent 23 offense. 24 3. The secretary of state shall promulgate such rules and regulations 25 as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this 26 section. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 28 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 29 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 30 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 31 on or before such effective date.